Washington statutes.
RCW 2.06.070

Original appointments—Election of judges—Terms of office.

Upon the taking effect of RCW 2.06.010 through 2.06.100, the governor shall appoint the judges of the court of appeals for each district in the numbers provided in RCW 2.06.020, who shall hold office until the second Monday in January of the year following the first state general election following the effective date of this act. In making the original appointments the governor shall take into consideration such factors as: Personal character; intellect; ability; diversity of background of experience in the practice of the law; diversity of political philosophy; diversity of educational experience; and diversity of affiliation with social and economic groups, for the purpose of establishing a balanced appellate court with the highest quality of personnel. At the first state general election after the effective date of this act there shall be elected from each district the number of judges provided for in RCW 2.06.020. Upon taking office the judges of each division elected shall come together at the direction of the chief justice and be divided by lot into three equal groups; those of the first group shall hold office until the second Monday in January of 1973, those of the second group shall hold office until the second Monday in January of 1975, and those of the third group shall hold office until the second Monday in January of 1977, and until their successors are elected and qualified. Thereafter, judges shall be elected for the full term of six years and until their successors are elected and qualified, commencing with the second Monday in January succeeding their election: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That if the governor shall make appointments to the appellate court from membership of the superior court, the governor shall, in making appointments filling vacancies created in the superior courts by such action, take into consideration such factors as: Personal character; intellect; ability; diversity of background of experience in the practice of the law; diversity of political philosophy; diversity of educational experience; and diversity of affiliation with social and economic groups, for the purpose of maintaining a balanced superior court with the highest quality of personnel.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 221 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1969 ex.s. c 221: The effective date of this act [1969 ex.s. c 221] is May 8, 1969, see preface to 1969 session laws.